Hawaii statutes.
[§40-87] Lapse of department of education
appropriations. Upon the lapse of an appropriation to the department of
education, moneys which remain unencumbered shall be returned to the state
treasury within ninety days. [L 1986, c 321, §3]

Note

Repeal of section by L 1986, c 321, §12 as amended by L 1987,
c 283, §69; L 1989, c 371, §7; L 1991, c 163, §3; L 1993, c 314, §2; L Sp 1993,
c 8, §22; L 1997, c 180, §1; L 1998, c 115, §24; and L 2005, c 137, §1 deleted
by L 2006, c 161, §7.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next